Washington statutes.
RCW 7.110.060

Statute of limitations.

(1) An action under RCW 7.110.020 or 7.110.025 for:

(a) An unauthorized disclosure may not be brought later than four years from the date the disclosure was discovered or should have been discovered with the exercise of reasonable diligence; and

(b) A threat to disclose may not be brought later than four years from the date of the threat to disclose.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section, this section is subject to the tolling statutes of this state.

(3) In an action under RCW 7.110.020 or 7.110.025 by a depicted individual who was a minor on the date of the disclosure or threat to disclose, the time specified in subsection (1) of this section does not begin to run until the depicted individual attains the age of majority.

[ 2024 c 88 s 15; 2023 c 65 s 7.]